New York, session 2025-2026, A9343.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breed- 2 ing law is amended by adding a new subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. The commission shall prohibit any casino, mobile sports wagering 4 licensee or mobile sports wagering operator from accepting in-play 5 sports wagers from sports bettors in this state. 6 § 2. Paragraph (x) of subdivision 1 of section 1367 of the racing, 7 pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as amended by section 3 of part Y 8 of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 9 (x) "Sports wagering" means wagering on sporting events or any portion 10 thereof, or on the individual performance statistics of athletes partic- 11 ipating in a sporting event, or combination of sporting events, by any 12 system or method of wagering, including, but not limited to, in-person 13 communication and electronic communication through internet websites 14 accessed via a mobile device or computer, and mobile device applica- 15 tions; provided however that sports wagers shall include, but are not 16 limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, over-under bets, 17 money line, pools, in-game wagering, [in-play bets,] proposition bets, 18 and straight bets; 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13927-01-5